Maine, session 132, LD320.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 10 MRSA §1471, sub-§6-A, as amended by PL 1995, c. 65, Pt. A, §19 and
affected by §153 and Pt. C, §15, is further amended to read:
6-A. Reconstructable motor vehicle. "Reconstructable motor vehicle" means a used
motor vehicle that does not meet the inspection standards as set forth in Title 29‑A, section
1751, and that is sold, offered for sale or negotiated for sale to a person other than another
dealer for the purpose of transportation after repair or rebuilding.
Sec. 2. 10 MRSA §1474, sub-§1, as amended by PL 1995, c. 65, Pt. A, §20 and
affected by §153 and Pt. C, §15, is further amended to read:
1. Warranty content. A dealer warrants that the motor vehicle the dealer sells,
negotiates the sale of, offers for sale or transfers to a person other than another dealer has
been inspected in accordance with met the inspection standards in Title 29‑A, section 1751,
and with the rules promulgated under that section: 1756.
A. That the motor vehicle is in the condition and meets the standards required by that
law and the rules; or
B. If the motor vehicle is a reconstructable motor vehicle, that the motor vehicle is in
the condition specified in the disclosure statement affixed to the vehicle as required by
subsection 4.
Sec. 3. 10 MRSA §1474, sub-§4, ¶G, as enacted by PL 1985, c. 429, §4, is
amended to read:
G. In addition to the penalties described in section 1477, any violation of subsection
1, paragraph B, and this subsection shall be is a Class E crime.
Sec. 4. 10 MRSA §1478, sub-§4, ¶A, as amended by PL 1995, c. 65, Pt. A, §22
and affected by §153 and Pt. C, §15, is further amended to read:
A. In the event that a motor vehicle subject to inspection pursuant to Title 29-A,
chapter 15 is submitted by a state agency to the state auction and does not possess a
valid inspection certificate that has been issued within 180 days previous to the auction,
the motor vehicle is subject to inspection pursuant to Title 29‑A, chapter 15. If the
motor vehicle passes inspection, a current and valid inspection certificate must be
affixed to the vehicle.
Sec. 5. 29-A MRSA §101, sub-§47-A, as amended by PL 2021, c. 216, §8, is
further amended to read:
47-A. Off-road vehicle. "Off-road vehicle" means a motor vehicle that, because of
the vehicle's design, configuration, original manufacture or original intended use, does not
meet the inspection standards of chapter 15, including former section 1751, the Federal
Motor Vehicle Safety Standards, the United States Environmental Protection Agency's
pollutant requirements or the National Highway Traffic and Safety Administration's crash
testing standards and that is not a moped or motorcycle.
Sec. 6. 29-A MRSA §458-B, sub-§7, as amended by PL 2011, c. 139, §3, is
repealed.
Page 1 - 132LR0769(01)

Sec. 7. 29-A MRSA §470, sub-§2, as enacted by PL 2003, c. 125, §1, is amended
to read:
2. Inspection and equipment Equipment. An experimental motor vehicle is exempt
from inspection requirements under section 1751 but must comply with the equipment
standards of chapter 17 to include at a minimum: body components, an exhaust system,
reflectors, running gear, tires, a horn, lights, directional signals, brakes, a steering
mechanism, windshield wipers, safety seat belts and rearview mirrors.
Sec. 8. 29-A MRSA §517, sub-§1-B, as enacted by PL 2003, c. 490, Pt. D, §1, is
amended to read:
1-B. Low-speed vehicle. A low-speed vehicle loaned by a dealer to a municipality is
exempt from registration fees and is not subject to inspection pursuant to section 1752 but
must be registered and must be in compliance with equipment provisions under section
1925.
Sec. 9. 29-A MRSA §517-A, first ¶, as enacted by PL 2001, c. 116, §1, is amended
to read:
Vehicles owned by an organized veterans group and used exclusively for ceremonial
activities, including parades, are exempt from registration requirements and registration
fees. These vehicles must be inspected A vehicle for which inspection is required pursuant
to chapter 15, subchapter I 1 must be inspected. For purposes of this section, "organized
veterans group" means the American Legion, Veterans of Foreign Wars or an organized
league of veterans of the United States Marine Corps.
Sec. 10. 29-A MRSA §525, sub-§4, as enacted by PL 1993, c. 683, Pt. A, §2 and
affected by Pt. B, §5, is repealed.
Sec. 11. 29-A MRSA §1751, as amended by PL 2001, c. 234, §§1 and 2, is repealed.
Sec. 12. 29-A MRSA §1752, as amended by PL 2017, c. 165, §6, is repealed.
Sec. 13. 29-A MRSA §1753, sub-§4, ¶D, as amended by PL 2007, c. 348, §3, is
repealed.
Sec. 14. 29-A MRSA §1754, sub-§1-A, as enacted by PL 2011, c. 191, §1, is
repealed.
Sec. 15. 29-A MRSA §1756, sub-§2, as enacted by PL 1993, c. 683, Pt. A, §2 and
affected by Pt. B, §5, is repealed.
Sec. 16. 29-A MRSA §1756, sub-§6, as enacted by PL 1997, c. 786, §4, is
repealed.
Sec. 17. 29-A MRSA §1756, sub-§7, as enacted by PL 1997, c. 786, §4, is
repealed.
Sec. 18. 29-A MRSA §1757, as enacted by PL 1993, c. 683, Pt. A, §2 and affected
by Pt. B, §5, is repealed.
Sec. 19. 29-A MRSA §1758, sub-§3, as amended by PL 2011, c. 167, §2 and
affected by §§3 and 7, is further amended to read:
Page 2 - 132LR0769(01)

3. Motorcycles; proof of inspection. If a motorcycle meets the inspection standard,
upon payment of applicable inspection fees pursuant to section 1751, subsection 3‑A a
valid certificate of inspection and an official inspection sticker for the motorcycle must be
issued. The certificate of inspection must be kept with the registration certificate of the
motorcycle and the official inspection sticker must be affixed to the rear of the motorcycle
on the registration plate.
The official inspection sticker must be located so that it is completely and clearly visible
from the rear of the motorcycle. If the registration plate is reassigned to another motorcycle
pursuant to section 463, subsection 4, the certificate of inspection and the official inspection
sticker expire upon reassignment.
Sec. 20. 29-A MRSA §1762, sub-§8, as enacted by PL 1997, c. 786, §5, is
repealed.
Sec. 21. Additional changes to law. The Department of the Secretary of State
Bureau of Motor Vehicles shall submit a bill to the Second Regular Session of the 132nd
Legislature to make changes in the Maine Revised Statutes to fully implement this Act.